North Dakota, session 69, HB1408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-03-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-03-02. When legislative assembly meets.
1. The legislative assembly shall meet at the seat of government in the month of
December following the election of theits members thereof for organizational and
orientation purposes and shall thereafter recess until the time provided in
subsection 2.
2. The legislative assembly shall reconvene at twelve noonannually for a number of days
to be determined by the legislative assembly, but the number of days must be
scheduled within a seventy calendar day period each year, subject to subsection 3 .
a. Each year, the legislative assembly shall convene on the first TuesdayMonday
after the third day in January of the year following the organizational session as
provided in subsection 1 or at twelve noon on a date selected by the legislative
management but not earlier than January second nor later than January eleventh
of the year following the organizational session and, following. At the close of
business of the regular session, the legislative assembly shall adjournrecess
subject to subsection 3.
b. The first week of each year the legislative assembly is convened, it shall convene
on Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, and Friday. Thereafter, the
legislative assembly shall primarily convene on Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday,
Page No. 1 25.0902.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
and Thursday. The legislative assembly shall convene on Friday only as
determined by the legislative management with prior notice to the legislative
assembly. A standing committee of the legislative assembly may meet on a
Friday with prior notice to the presiding officer of the chamber.
3. Notwithstanding a motion to adjourn sine die, the legislative assembly shall reconvene
as determined by the legislative management. The number of natural days used may
not exceed the number of natural days available under the constitution which have not
been previously used by that legislative assembly in regular session under
subsection 2.
4. The legislative management shall determine the structure and logistics of the
legislative session.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective on January 1, 2027.
Page No. 2 25.0902.02000